Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 10. Elevators.

Administrative Code. —

For elevator safety standards, see 8 AAC 77.

Collateral references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elevators and Escalators, § 1 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51 — 64, 71.

What is “passenger elevator” within safety statute or regulation. 77 ALR2d 477.

Liability of building owner, lessee, or manager for injury or death resulting from use of automatic passenger elevator. 99 ALR5th 141.

Liability of maintainer, repairer, or installer of automatic passenger elevator for injury resulting from use of elevator.
115 ALR5th 1.

Sec. 18.60.800.
Elevator safety standards.

Unless the Department of Labor and Workforce Development establishes by regulation a different edition, the most current edition of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers constitutes the minimum elevator safety code in the state. Section 1001.1, Inspection and Test Periods, of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators is not adopted as a part of the minimum elevator safety code in the state.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall

adopt or change regulations to carry out the provisions of AS

18.60.800

—

18.60.820

;

inspect and certify elevators to meet the safety requirements, but need not inspect or certify elevators in a municipality that has adopted or prescribed elevator safety standards under (d) of this section if the commissioner determines that inspection and certification by the municipality adequately protect the public;

establish, by regulation, fees for inspections performed under AS

18.60.800

—

18.60.820

; and

maintain a record of all inspections performed and of all inspection fees collected.

Inspections of elevators by the department shall be performed in accordance with the procedures set out in the most recent edition of the National Standard Practice for the Inspection of Elevators and Escalators published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

A municipality may adopt the standards established by this section or prescribe standards more stringent than those established by this section.

[Renumbered as AS

18.60.825

.]

Inspection fees collected under (b) of this section shall be deposited into the building safety account created under AS

44.31.025

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1979; am §§ 1—4 ch 31 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2 ch 10 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 12 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1992; am § 13 ch 6 SLA 1993; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 21 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 96 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1983, at which time former (d) was relettered as former (e).

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For elevator safety standards code, see 8 AAC 77, art. 1.

For inspection, registration and certificate of operation, see 8 AAC 77, art. 2.

For inspection fees, see 8 AAC 77, art. 3.

For variances, see 8 AAC 77, art. 4.

For violations, see 8 AAC 77, art. 5.

For appeals, see 8 AAC 77, art. 6.

Collateral references. —

Liability of building owner, lessee, or manager for injury or death resulting from use of automatic passenger elevator. 99 ALR5th 141.

Sec. 18.60.810.
Emergency power source. [Repealed, § 5 ch 31 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 18.60.820.
Enforcement of compliance.

A Department of Labor and Workforce Development inspector shall give written notice to the owner of an elevator of each violation of safety standards as a result of inspection by the inspector.
If within 15 days after receipt of written notice of a safety violation the person notified does not rectify the condition, the commissioner of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall authorize the elevator to be closed until the safety violations are rectified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.822.
Snow safety and operation plan. [Repealed, § 3 ch 63 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 05.45.]

Sec. 18.60.825.
Definition.

In AS

18.60.800

—

18.60.820

, “elevator” includes elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, and moving walks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was formerly AS

18.60.800(e)

. Renumbered in 2002.